Ohio, session 136, HB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5501.03 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5501.03. (A) The department of transportation shall: 6
(1) Exercise and perform such other duties, powers, and 7
functions as are conferred by law on the director, the 8
department, the assistant directors, the deputy directors, or on 9
the divisions of the department; 10
(2) Coordinate and develop, in cooperation with local, 11
regional, state, and federal planning agencies and authorities, 12
comprehensive and balanced state policy and planning to meet 13
present and future needs for adequate transportation facilities 14
in this state, including recommendations for adequate funding of 15
the implementation of such planning; 16

H. B. No. 63 Page 2
As Introduced
(3) Coordinate its activities with those of other 17
appropriate state departments, public agencies, and authorities, 18
and enter into any contracts with such departments, agencies, 19
and authorities as may be necessary to carry out its duties, 20
powers, and functions; 21
(4) Cooperate with and assist the public utilities 22
commission in the commission's administration of sections 23
4907.47 to 4907.476 of the Revised Code, particularly with 24
respect to the federal highway administration; 25
(5) Cooperate with and assist the Ohio power siting board 26
in the board's administration of Chapter 4906. of the Revised 27
Code; 28
(6) Give particular consideration to the development of 29
policy and planning for public transportation facilities, and to 30
the coordination of associated activities relating thereto, as 31
prescribed under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section; 32
(7) Conduct, in cooperation with the Ohio legislative 33
service commission, any studies or comparisons of state traffic 34
laws and local traffic ordinances with model laws and ordinances 35
that may be required to meet program standards adopted by the 36
United States department of transportation pursuant to the 37
"Highway Safety Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 731, U.S.C.A. 401; 38
(8) Prepare, print, distribute, and advertise books, maps, 39
pamphlets, and other information that, in the judgment of the 40
director, will inform the public and other governmental 41
departments, agencies, and authorities as to the duties, powers, 42
and functions of the department; 43
(9) In its research and development program, consider 44
technologies for improving safety, mobility, aviation and 45

H. B. No. 63 Page 3
As Introduced
aviation education, transportation facilities, roadways, 46
including construction techniques and materials to prolong 47
project life, being used or developed by other states that have 48
geographic, geologic, or climatic features similar to this 49
state's, and collaborate with those states in that development.; 50
(10) Not later than June 30, 2031, install and maintain a 51
system of security cameras at each rest area over which the 52
department has jurisdiction. The director of transportation 53
shall consult with the director of public safety and the 54
attorney general in determining an appropriate schedule for the 55
installation and maintenance of the security cameras. 56
(B) Nothing contained in this section shall be held to in 57
any manner affect, limit, restrict, or otherwise interfere with 58
the exercise of powers relating to transportation facilities by 59
appropriate agencies of the federal government, or by counties, 60
municipal corporations, or other political subdivisions or 61
special districts in this state authorized by law to exercise 62
such powers. 63
(C) The department may use all appropriate sources of 64
revenue to assist in the development and implementation of rail 65
service as defined by division (C) of section 4981.01 of the 66
Revised Code. 67
(D) The director of transportation may enter into 68
contracts with public agencies including political subdivisions, 69
other state agencies, boards, commissions, regional transit 70
authorities, county transit boards, and port authorities, to 71
administer the design, qualification of bidders, competitive bid 72
letting, construction inspection, research, and acceptance of 73
any projects or transportation facilities administered by the 74
department, provided the administration of such projects or 75

H. B. No. 63 Page 4
As Introduced
transportation facilities is performed in accordance with all 76
applicable state and federal laws and regulations with oversight 77
by the department. 78
(E) The director may enter into cooperative or contractual 79
agreements with any individual, organization, or business 80
related to the creation or promotion of a traveler information 81
program. The traveler information program shall provide real- 82
time traffic conditions and travel time information to travelers 83
by telephone, text message, internet, or other similar means at 84
no cost to the traveler. The director may contract with a 85
program manager for the traveler information program. The 86
program manager shall be responsible for all costs associated 87
with the development and operation of the traveler information 88
program. The compensation due to a program manager or vendor 89
under any of these agreements may include deferred compensation 90
in an amount determined by the director. Excess revenue shall be 91
remitted to the department for deposit into the highway 92
operating fund. 93
(F) Any materials or data submitted to, made available to, 94
or received by the director of transportation, to the extent 95
that the materials or data consist of trade secrets, as defined 96
in section 1333.61 of the Revised Code, or commercial or 97
financial information, are confidential and are not public 98
records for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 99
Section 2. That existing section 5501.03 of the Revised 100
Code is hereby repealed. 101